Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle D. Supervision of Out-of-State Trust Institution.

§ 81-27-2.301.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

To the extent consistent with subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner may make such examinations of any office established and maintained in this state pursuant to this article by an out-of-state trust institution as the commissioner may deem necessary to determine whether the office is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state and in accordance with safe and sound banking practices. The provisions of Sections 81-1-81, 81-1-83 and 81-23-17 shall apply to such examinations.

The commissioner may require periodic reports regarding any out-of-state trust institution that has established and maintained an office in this state pursuant to this article. The required reports shall be provided by such trust institution or by the home state regulator. Any reporting requirements prescribed by the commissioner under this subsection (b) shall be (i) consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to state trust companies and (ii) appropriate for the purpose of enabling the commissioner to carry out his or her responsibilities under this article.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating and information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any office in this state of an out-of-state trust institution, or any office of a state trust institution in any host state, and the commissioner may accept such a party’s report of examination and report of investigation in lieu of conducting his or her own examination or investigation.

The commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a state trust institution or an out-of-state trust institution maintaining an office in this state to engage the services of such agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the commissioner’s examiners to such agency at a reasonable rate of compensation.

The commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any office established and maintained in this state by an out-of-state trust institution or any office established and maintained by a state trust institution in any host state. However, the commissioner may at any time take such actions independently if the commissioner deems such actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under this subarticle or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state; but in the case of an out-of-state trust institution, the commissioner shall recognize the exclusive authority of the home state regulator over corporate governance matters and the primary responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to safety and soundness matters.

Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains one or more offices in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of this state and regulations of the commissioner. Such fees may be shared with other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies in accordance with agreements between such parties and the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.302.
Enforcement.

After notice and opportunity for hearing,

The commissioner may determine:

That an office maintained by an out-of-state trust institution in this state is being operated in violation of any provision of the laws of this state or in an unsafe and unsound manner; or

That a company is engaged in an unauthorized trust activity. In either event, the commissioner shall have the authority to take all such enforcement actions as he or she would be empowered to take if the office or the company were a state trust company, including but not limited to issuing an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the company from engaging in a trust business in this state;

The commissioner may determine by order that an out-of-state trust institution engaging in or proposing to engage in a trust business in this state does not meet the requirements for establishing a representative trust office in this state pursuant to Section 81-27-2.202, which order shall be effective on the date of issuance or such other date as the commissioner shall determine;

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any action permitted by Section 81-27-2.302(a) or (b) without notice or opportunity for hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken. The commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home state regulator of each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state trust institution and, to the extent practicable, shall consult and cooperate with the home state regulator in pursuing and resolving said enforcement action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.303.
Notice of subsequent merger, closing, etc.

Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains an office in this state pursuant to this article, or the home state regulator of such trust institution, shall give at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice (or, in the case of an emergency transaction, such shorter notice as is consistent with applicable state or federal law) to the commissioner of (i) any merger, consolidation, or other transaction that would cause a change of control with respect to such out-of-state trust institution or any bank holding company that controls such trust institution, with the result that an application would be required to be filed pursuant to the federal Change in Bank Control Act of 1978, as amended, 12 USCS Section 1817(j), or the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, 12 USCS Section 1841 et seq., or any successor statutes thereto, (ii) any transfer of all or substantially all of the trust accounts or trust assets of the out-of-state trust institution to another person or (iii) the closing or disposition of any office in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.